District of Columbia statutes.
47-1303.03

Tax deed.

(a)

The Mayor shall issue a deed for the bid off property sold pursuant to § 47-1303.02 to the person whose offer the Mayor accepts.

(b)

The deed shall be prima facie evidence of a good and perfect title in fee simple to the bid off property.

History

Feb. 28, 1898, 30 Stat. 250, ch. 32, § 2c
as added Apr. 30, 1994, D.C. Law 10-115, § 202(c), 41 DCR 1216
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-1303.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1303.3.